Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.077

Department of veterans affairs—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the department of veterans affairs to the director, the deputy director, no more than two assistant directors, administrators and directors of nursing services at each state veterans' home, a confidential secretary for the deputy director, and a confidential secretary for each assistant director.

[ 2023 c 327 s 1; 2001 c 84 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 115 s 7.]

NOTES: